Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-38,102
Certification of trust; use; form.

(a) A trustee may present a certification of trust to any person other than a beneficiary in lieu of a copy of any trust instrument to establish the existence or terms of the trust. The trustee may present the certification of trust voluntarily or at the request of the person with whom he or she is dealing. Notwithstanding any provision of the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code to the contrary, no person is required to accept and rely solely on a certification of trust in lieu of a copy of, or excerpts from, the trust instrument itself.

(b) A certification of trust shall be in the form of an affidavit and signed and acknowledged by all acting trustees of the trust.

Laws 2000, LB 1197, § 1;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 30-3701;

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 102.